Utah statutes.
73-22-8.   Geothermal fluids as water resource -- Application for
appropriation required -- Priorities.
(1) Geothermal fluids are deemed to be a special kind of underground water
resource, related to and potentially affecting other water resources of the
state. The utilization or distribution for their thermal content and
subsurface injection or disposal of same shall constitute a beneficial use of
the water resources of the state.
(2) (a)  Geothermal owners shall, prior to the commencement of, or increase
in, production from a well or group of wells to be operated in concert, file
an application with the division to appropriate such geothermal fluids as will
be extracted from the well or group of wells. Publication of applications
shall be made as provided in Section 73-3-6, and protests may be filed as
provided in Section 73-3-7. The division shall approve an application if it
finds that the applicant is a geothermal owner and that the proposed
extraction of geothermal fluids will not impair existing rights to the waters
of the state.
(b)  The division may grant the quantity of an application on a provisional
basis, to be finalized upon stabilization of well production. Flow testing of
a discovery well shall not require an application to appropriate geothermal
fluids.
(3)  The date of an application to appropriate geothermal fluids, when
approved by the division, shall be the priority date as between the geothermal
owner and the owners of rights to water other than geothermal fluids. No
priorities shall be created among geothermal owners by the approval of an
application to appropriate geothermal fluids.
